Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 23 Homicide

11-23-1.
Murder.

The unlawful killing of a human being with malice aforethought is murder. Every murder perpetrated by poison, lying in wait, or any other kind of willful, deliberate, malicious, and premeditated killing, or committed in the perpetration of, or attempt to perpetrate, any arson or any violation of §

11-4-2

,

11-4-3

, or

11-4-4

, rape, any degree of sexual assault or child molestation, burglary or breaking and entering, robbery, kidnapping, or committed during the course of the perpetration, or attempted perpetration, of felony manufacture, sale, delivery, or other distribution of a controlled substance otherwise prohibited by the provisions of chapter 28 of title 21, or committed against any law enforcement officer in the performance of his or her duty or committed against an assistant attorney general or special assistant attorney general in the performance of his or her duty, or perpetrated from a premeditated design unlawfully and maliciously to effect the death of any human being other than him or her who is killed, is murder in the first degree. Any other murder is murder in the second degree. The degree of murder may be charged in the indictment or information, and the jury may find the degree of murder, whether the murder is charged in the indictment or information or not, or may find the defendant guilty of a lesser offense than that charged in the indictment or information, in accordance with the provisions of §

12-17-14

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1392, § 1; P.L. 1932, ch. 1943, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-23-1

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 5; P.L. 1979, ch. 178, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 247, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 284, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 152, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 199, § 1.

11-23-2.
Penalties for murder.

Every person guilty of murder in the first degree shall be imprisoned for life. Every person guilty of murder in the first degree: (1) committed intentionally while engaged in the commission of another capital offense or other felony for which life imprisonment may be imposed; (2) committed in a manner creating a great risk of death to more than one person by means of a weapon or device or substance which would normally be hazardous to the life of more than one person; (3) committed at the direction of another person in return for money or any other thing of monetary value from that person; (4) committed in a manner involving torture or an aggravated battery to the victim; (5) committed against any member of the judiciary, law enforcement officer, corrections employee, assistant attorney general or special assistant attorney general, or firefighter arising from the lawful performance of his or her official duties; (6) committed by a person who at the time of the murder was committed to confinement in the adult correctional institutions or the state reformatory for women upon conviction of a felony; or (7) committed during the course of the perpetration or attempted perpetration of felony manufacture, sale, delivery or other distribution of a controlled substance otherwise prohibited by the provisions of chapter 28 of title 21; shall be imprisoned for life and if ordered by the court pursuant to chapter 19.2 of title 12 that person shall not be eligible for parole from imprisonment. Every person guilty of murder in the second degree shall be imprisoned for not less than ten (10) years and may be imprisoned for life.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, §§ 1, 2; P.L. 1915, ch. 1258, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-23-2

; P.L. 1973 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 280, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 284, § 4; P.L. 1996, ch. 152, § 1.

11-23-2.1.
Penalty for murder of a kidnapped person under the age of eighteen (18).

If any person under the age of eighteen (18) who is kidnapped in violation of §

11-26-1

by a person other than his or her natural or adopted parent dies as a direct result of the kidnapping, then the person convicted of the offense shall be guilty of murder in the first degree and shall be punished by imprisonment for life, and the court may, pursuant to chapter 19.2 of title 12, order that that person not be eligible for parole.

History of Section.

P.L. 1984, ch. 362, § 1.

11-23-2.2.
Penalty for murder in the first degree.

Every person guilty of murder in the first degree shall serve not less than fifteen (15) years of his or her sentence before being eligible for parole.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 415, § 1.

11-23-3.
Manslaughter.

Every person who shall commit manslaughter shall be imprisoned not exceeding thirty (30) years.

Where the provisions of The Domestic Violence Prevention Act, chapter 29 of title 12, are applicable, the penalties for violation of this section shall also include the penalties as provided in §

12-29-5

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 277, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 343, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 395, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 606, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

11-23-3

; P.L. 1985, ch. 421, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 539, § 9.

11-23-4.
Joinder of murder count with count for concealment of birth.

Any woman, who shall be indicted or charged by information for the murder of her infant child born out of wedlock, may also be charged in the same indictment or information with either or both of the offenses mentioned in §

11-18-4

, and if, upon trial, the jury shall acquit her on the charge of murder and find her guilty of the other offenses, or either of them, judgment and sentence may be awarded against her accordingly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 281, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 347, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 399, § 11; P.L. 1926, ch. 858, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 610, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

11-23-4

; P.L. 1974, ch. 118, § 5.

11-23-5.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 231, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2019, ch. 27, § 4, effective June 19, 2019.

11-23-6.
Controlled substance transaction resulting in death of minor.

Any person who sells, delivers, or distributes a controlled substance, the sale of which would constitute a felony under chapter 28 of title 21, to a minor, or knowingly provides a controlled substance for sale, delivery, or distribution to a minor, and death has resulted to the minor because of the ingestion orally or the injection or inhalation of the controlled substance, shall be imprisoned for life.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 287, § 1; P.L. 2018, ch. 105, § 2; P.L. 2018, ch. 111, § 2.

11-23-7.
Controlled substance delivery resulting in death.

A person is guilty of a controlled substance delivery resulting in death when, as a result of an unlawful delivery of a controlled substance in exchange for anything of value to an adult, death results to that adult because of the ingestion orally, or the injection or inhalation of the controlled substance.

A person is guilty of a controlled substance delivery resulting in death when, as a result of an unlawful delivery of a controlled substance to another person who subsequently delivers such controlled substance to an adult, death results to that adult because of the ingestion orally or the injection or inhalation of the controlled substance.

Those in violation of subsection (a) or (b), upon conviction, shall be imprisoned up to life.

For the purposes of this section only, any person who, in good faith, without malice and in the absence of evidence of an intent to defraud, seeks medical assistance for someone experiencing a controlled substance overdose shall not be charged or prosecuted for a violation of this section, if the evidence for the charge was gained as a result of the seeking of medical assistance.

The phrase “in exchange for anything of value” does not apply to the act of sharing a controlled substance when the sharing results in the proximate cause of a person’s death under this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2018, ch. 105, § 3; P.L. 2018, ch. 111, § 3.